src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! VERBS
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!
! Verb forms in Kurdish are usually formed from a prefix indicating mood, a 
! stem (either present or past) and a personal suffix. For example:
!
! 'Ez diçim' (< 'çûn')
!     di- ç          -im
!     IND read.PRES  P1.SG
! 'I read' 
!
! But if the verb is a compound, the prefix becomes an infix:
!
! 'Ez vedixwim' (< 'vexwarin')
!     ve-  di- xw       -im
!     PREF IND eat.PRES P1.SG
! 'I drink'
!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!



LEXICON Accidents_uen

ûn+Verb+Inf@D.PREF@:ûn@D.PREF@ # ;
ûn+Verb+Pri@R.PREF.di@:@R.PREF.di@ PersonalSuffixes ;
ûn+Verb+Prs@R.PREF.bi@:@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixes ;
ûn+Verb+Neg+Pri@R.PREF.na@:@R.PREF.na@ PersonalSuffixes ;
ûn+Verb+Past@R.PREF.di@:û@R.PREF.di@ PersonalSuffixes ;
ûn+Verb+Pis@R.PREF.bi@:û@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixes ;
ûn+Verb+Neg+Past@R.PREF.na@:û@R.PREF.na@ PersonalSuffixes ;
ûn+Verb+Neg+Pis@R.PREF.ne@:û@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ;

LEXICON Accidents_in

in+Verb+Inf@D.PREF@:in@D.PREF@ # ;
in+Verb+Pri@R.PREF.di@:@R.PREF.di@ PersonalSuffixes ;
in+Verb+Prs@R.PREF.bi@:@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixes ;
in+Verb+Neg+Pri@R.PREF.na@:@R.PREF.na@ PersonalSuffixes ;
in+Verb+Past@R.PREF.di@:i@R.PREF.di@ PersonalSuffixes ;
in+Verb+Pis@R.PREF.bi@:i@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixes ;
in+Verb+Neg+Past@R.PREF.na@:i@R.PREF.na@ PersonalSuffixes ;
in+Verb+Neg+Pis@R.PREF.ne@:i@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ;

LEXICON PersonalSuffixes

+P1+Sg:%^VSUFim # ;
+P2+Sg:%^VSUFî # ;
+P3+Sg:%^VSUFe # ;
+P1+Pl:%^VSUFin # ;
+P2+Pl:%^VSUFin # ;
+P3+Pl:%^VSUFin # ;
