src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbCompound
ve VerbRoot ;


LEXICON VerbRoot

Prefixes ;
PresentStems ;

LEXICON Prefixes

!!!   To form the present tense, the stressed progressive/habitual modal marker
!!! di- is prefixed to the present stem, and a suffixed personal ending is added 
!!! to the stem.

@P.PREF.di@:di%^PREF@P.PREF.di@ PresentStems ;
@P.PREF.bi@:bi%^PREF@P.PREF.bi@ PresentStems ;
@P.PREF.na@:na%^PREF@P.PREF.na@ PresentStems ;
@P.PREF.ne@:ne%^PREF@P.PREF.ne@ PresentStems ;

PresentStems;

LEXICON PresentStems

ç:ç Accidents_uen  ; ! lm="çûn" :: "to go"
şust:şo Accidents_in ; !lm="şustin" :: "to wash"
axaft:axiv Accidents_in ; !lm="axaftin" :: "to speak"
parast:parast Accidents_in ; !lm="parastin" :: "to protect"
firot:firot Accidents_in ; !lm="firotin" :: "to sell"
bîst:bîst Accidents_in ; !lm="bîstin" :: "to hear"
hat:hat Accidents_in ; !lm="hatin" :: "to come"
hinart:hinart Accidents_in ; !lm="hinartin" :: "to send"
kir:ke Accidents_in ; !lm="kirin" :: "to do"
mîst:mîst Accidents_in ; !lm="mîstin" :: "to urinate"
rûnişt:rûnişt Accidents_in ; !lm="rûniştin" :: "to sit"
vegot:vegot Accidents_in ; !lm="vegotin" :: "to report"
xwar:xw Accidents_in ; !lm="xwarin" :: "to eat"
xwend:xwend Accidents_in ; !lm="xwendin" :: "to read"
şand:şand Accidents_in ; !lm="şandin" :: "to send"


mirand:mirîn Accidents_in ; !lm="mirandin" :: "to cause to die"
weşand:weşîn Accidents_in ; !lm="weşandin" :: "to publish"
azirand:azirîn Accidents_in ; !lm="azirandin" :: "to incite"
êşand:êşîn Accidents_in ; !lm="êşandin" :: "to hurt"
belişand:belişîn Accidents_in ; !lm="belişandin" :: "to incite"
pesinand:pesinîn Accidents_in ; !lm="pesinandin" :: "to pray"
dabiland:dabilîn Accidents_in ; !lm="dabilandin" :: "to swallow"
qedand:qedîn Accidents_in ; !lm="qedandin" :: "to finish"
fetisand:fetisîn Accidents_in ; !lm="fetisandin" :: "to choke"
taşand:taşîn Accidents_in ; !lm="taşandin" :: "to educate"

! lm="fikirîn" :: "to think"
! lm="tirsîn" :: "to fear"
! lm="zanîn" :: "to know"
! lm="karîn" :: "to be able"
! lm="hizirîn" :: "to think"
! lm="pûnijîn" :: "to think"
! lm="ramîn" :: "to think"
! lm="revîn" :: "to escape"
! lm="doşîn" :: "to milk"
! lm="bişirîn" :: "to smile"
! lm="anîn" :: "to bring"
! lm="firrîn" :: "to fly"
! lm="kirrîn" :: "to buy"
! lm="mêjîn" :: "to suck"
! lm="bazdan" :: "to escape"
! lm="hênan" :: "to bring"
! lm="rahênan" :: "to train"
! lm="meşiyan" :: "to walk"

xwest:xwaz Accidents_in ; !lm="xwestin" :: "to want"
dît:bîn Accidents_in ; !lm="dîtin" :: "to see"

!!! Note: http://fr.wiktionary.org/wiki/Annexe:Conjugaison_kurde/vexwarin // prefixes are infixes

! vexwar:vexw ; ! lm="vexwarin" :: "to drink" 
! vekir:vekir ; ! lm="vekirin" :: "to open"
! hild:hild ; ! lm="hildan" :: "to lift"
! rûnişt:rûnê ; ! lm="rûniştin" :: "to sit down"
! behs% kir:behs% kir ; ! lm="behs kirin" :: "to discuss"
! alîkarî% kir:alîkarî% kir ; ! lm="alîkarî kirin" :: "to help"
